dev/gsoc2011/monodix/noun/noun.bn.dix
    <pardef n="গাধা__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলো</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>র</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>গুলোর</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="m" /><s n="aa" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="জজ__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ইউএনও__n_mf">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l />
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>রা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টা</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টি</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>কে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দেরকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="obj" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টাকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টিকে</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="obj" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>য়ের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>দের</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টার</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>টির</l>
          <r><s n="n" /><s n="mf" /><s n="hu" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /><s n="def" /></r>
        </p>
        <par n="enclitic" />
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ইমাম"><i>ইমাম</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তাত্ত্বিক"><i>তাত্ত্বিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বোলার"><i>বোলার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চেয়ারম্যান"><i>চেয়ারম্যান</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ছাত্র"><i>ছাত্র</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দালাল"><i>দালাল</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জজ"><i>জজ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শ্রমিক"><i>শ্রমিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মুখপাত্র"><i>মুখপাত্র</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রক্টর"><i>প্রক্টর</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভক্ত"><i>ভক্ত</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দর্শক"><i>দর্শক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডাকাত"><i>ডাকাত</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সরদার"><i>সরদার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রফেসর"><i>প্রফেসর</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গাধা"><i>গাধা</i><par n="গাধা__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="অলরাউন্ডার"><i>অলরাউন্ডার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আহ্বায়ক"><i>আহ্বায়ক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জনাব"><i>জনাব</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্যাপ্টেন"><i>ক্যাপ্টেন</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যারিস্টার"><i>ব্যারিস্টার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="খেলোয়াড়"><i>খেলোয়াড়</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউএনও"><i>ইউএনও</i><par n="ইউএনও__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মুসলমান"><i>মুসলমান</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মহাসচিব"><i>মহাসচিব</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যাটসম্যান"><i>ব্যাটসম্যান</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চিকিৎসক"><i>চিকিৎসক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সাংসদ"><i>সাংসদ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সাংবাদিক"><i>সাংবাদিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্রিকেটার"><i>ক্রিকেটার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="তরুণ"><i>তরুণ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লাজুক"><i>লাজুক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সম্মানিত"><i>সম্মানিত</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মেয়র"><i>মেয়র</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অধ্যক্ষ"><i>অধ্যক্ষ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বস"><i>বস</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রশাসক"><i>প্রশাসক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ম্যাজিস্ট্রেট"><i>ম্যাজিস্ট্রেট</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কর্তৃপক্ষ"><i>কর্তৃপক্ষ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বিশেষজ্ঞ"><i>বিশেষজ্ঞ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হাকিম"><i>হাকিম</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বৃদ্ধ"><i>বৃদ্ধ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রতিবেদক"><i>প্রতিবেদক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জেনারেল"><i>জেনারেল</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সন্দেহভাজন"><i>সন্দেহভাজন</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="স্ট্রাইকার"><i>স্ট্রাইকার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্যাথলিক"><i>ক্যাথলিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="কারিগর"><i>কারিগর</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডিন"><i>ডিন</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রাষ্ট্রদূত"><i>রাষ্ট্রদূত</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিদর্শক"><i>পরিদর্শক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ফকির"><i>ফকির</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="খ্রিষ্টান"><i>খ্রিষ্টান</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হাওলাদার"><i>হাওলাদার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আত্মীয়স্বজন"><i>আত্মীয়স্বজন</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বণিক"><i>বণিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="অপারেটর"><i>অপারেটর</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পেসার"><i>পেসার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="হেড"><i>হেড</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ড্রাইভার"><i>ড্রাইভার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্বাচক"><i>নির্বাচক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গোলরক্ষক"><i>গোলরক্ষক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডক্টর"><i>ডক্টর</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ঔপন্যাসিক"><i>ঔপন্যাসিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাউল"><i>বাউল</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রত্নতাত্ত্বিক"><i>প্রত্নতাত্ত্বিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আচার্য"><i>আচার্য</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পন্ডিত"><i>পন্ডিত</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="শিষ্য"><i>শিষ্য</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জ্যোতিষ"><i>জ্যোতিষ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="জ্যোতির্বৈজ্ঞানিক"><i>জ্যোতির্বৈজ্ঞানিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ডক্টরেট"><i>ডক্টরেট</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="রসায়নবিদ"><i>রসায়নবিদ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ব্যাকরণিক"><i>ব্যাকরণিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গভর্ণর"><i>গভর্ণর</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="পূর্বপুরুষ"><i>পূর্বপুরুষ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সতীর্থ"><i>সতীর্থ</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘটক"><i>ঘটক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গার্ড"><i>গার্ড</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="চ্যান্সেলর"><i>চ্যান্সেলর</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="লেবার"><i>লেবার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="নাবিক"><i>নাবিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আধিকারিক"><i>আধিকারিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="আবিষ্কারক"><i>আবিষ্কারক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ভাইসরয়"><i>ভাইসরয়</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সংস্কারক"><i>সংস্কারক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="ধর্মপ্রচারক"><i>ধর্মপ্রচারক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="দানব"><i>দানব</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="বাদক"><i>বাদক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="সুবেদার"><i>সুবেদার</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="গানিতিক"><i>গানিতিক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রভোস্ট"><i>প্রভোস্ট</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
    <e lm="মন্ত্রক"><i>মন্ত্রক</i><par n="জজ__n_mf"/></e>
